apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiemdviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juodviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jųdviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jodviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jodviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plural -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mes</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mūsų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mumis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mumyse</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūsų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jumis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jumyse</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiems</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juose</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joms</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jose</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Second declension -->
    <pardef n="abažūr/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ams</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uose</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>asna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="apaštalas"><i>apaštal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="audimas"><i>audim</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biurokratas"><i>biurokrat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daugumas"><i>daugum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dumblas"><i>dumbl</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faraonas"><i>faraon</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geologas"><i>geolog</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imtuvas"><i>imtuv</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanauninkas"><i>kanaunink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klimatas"><i>klimat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraštotyrininkas"><i>kraštotyrinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leitenantas"><i>leitenant</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mastas"><i>mast</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="momentas"><i>moment</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olandas"><i>oland</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patas"><i>pat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pistoletas"><i>pistolet</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pretendentas"><i>pretendent</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raistas"><i>raist</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salonas"><i>salon</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skundas"><i>skund</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strykas"><i>stryk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="technologas"><i>technolog</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turtas"><i>turt</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vasalas"><i>vasal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įrašas"><i>įraš</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žinovas"><i>žinov</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aižumas"><i>aižum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="analfabetas"><i>analfabet</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apkepas"><i>apkep</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ardumas"><i>ardum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atlenkimas"><i>atlenkim</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aulinukas"><i>aulinuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bailumas"><i>bailum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bartas"><i>bart</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bilsmas"><i>bilsm</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceitnotas"><i>ceitnot</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="denatūratas"><i>denatūrat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drevininkas"><i>drevinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekskursantas"><i>ekskursant</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fetišas"><i>fetiš</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geidulingumas"><i>geidulingum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gražumynas"><i>gražumyn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hermafroditas"><i>hermafrodit</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išdagas"><i>išdag</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalavijininkas"><i>kalavijinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaštas"><i>kašt</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klerkalas"><i>klerkal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kosmodromas"><i>kosmodrom</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvorumas"><i>kvorum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ligninas"><i>lignin</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mandarinas"><i>mandarin</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miklumas"><i>miklum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mėlynynas"><i>mėlynyn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="niurzgumas"><i>niurzgum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padaigas"><i>padaig</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="partizaniškumas"><i>partizaniškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pempiukas"><i>pempiuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plazmotronas"><i>plazmotron</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prasmingumas"><i>prasmingum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puristas"><i>purist</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="realistiškumas"><i>realistiškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="romumas"><i>romum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="savanoriškumas"><i>savanoriškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skalumas"><i>skalum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sluoksnynas"><i>sluoksnyn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stacionarumas"><i>stacionarum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sutažas"><i>sutaž</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teisiškumas"><i>teisiškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trekas"><i>trek</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uiguras"><i>uigur</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaišnumas"><i>vaišnum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veršiukas"><i>veršiuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vyžininkas"><i>vyžinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čiuptukas"><i>čiuptuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šiųmetukas"><i>šiųmetuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ūpingumas"><i>ūpingum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žvirgždynas"><i>žvirgždyn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
